src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON MALIS !!= * __@CODE@__ Short compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
                 +N:%>X4  MALIS0              ;
       +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X8  flagON-R            ;
       +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>    flagOFF-R           ;
                 +N:%>X2  MALLAS-             ;
                 +N:%>X4  DenominalAdjsCShort ;
                 +N:%>X2  DenominalNounsC     ;
        +N+Use/-PLX:%>X8  GEAHTES             ;
! +N+Der1+Der/Dimin:až»X2 DIMINC              ; !redundant
! +N+Der2+Der/Dimin:až»X2 DIMINC              ; !redundant

LEXICON DOAVTTIR !!= * __@CODE@__ only doavttir. Short compound-forms 
                     +N:%>X4  MALIS0              ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom+Use/-PLX:%>X4  R                   ;
           +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X8  flagON-R            ;
           +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>    flagOFF-R           ;
                     +N:%>X2  MALLAS-             ;
                     +N:%>X4  DenominalAdjsCShort ;
                     +N:%>X2  DenominalNounsC     ;
            +N+Use/-PLX:%>X8  GEAHTES             ;
!     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin:až»X2 DIMINC              ; !redundant
!     +N+Der2+Der/Dimin:až»X2 DIMINC              ; !redundant

LEXICON MALISLONG !!= * __@CODE@__  Long compound-forms Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
                     +N+Sg+Nom:%>X4     K                  ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4     R                  ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđá K                  ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđi K                  ;
                        +N+Ess:%>X4in   K                  ;
                            +N:%>X2     MALLAS-            ;
                            +N:%>X4     DenominalAdjsCLong ;
                            +N:%>X2     DenominalNounsC    ;
                   +N+Use/-PLX:%>X4     GEAHTES            ;
!            +N+Der1+Der/Dimin:až»X2    DIMINC             ; !redundant

LEXICON MALISLONGSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__  Long and short compound-forms. Tris. Inanim. Gradating C-Nouns
                     +N+Sg+Nom:%>X4     K               ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4     R               ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđá K               ;
  +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4#viđi K               ;
                        +N+Ess:%>X4in   K               ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X8     flagON-R        ;
                  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>       flagOFF-R       ;
                            +N:%>X2     MALLAS-         ;
                            +N:%>X4     DenominalAdjsC  ;
                            +N:%>X2     DenominalNounsC ;
                   +N+Use/-PLX:%>X8     GEAHTES         ;
                   +N+Use/-PLX:%>X4     GEAHTES         ;
!            +N+Der1+Der/Dimin:až»X2    DIMINC          ; !redundant


LEXICON OVCCIS !!= * __@CODE@__  Collective numerals gallis, moattes, moattis, máŋggas
 +N+Coll+Sg+Nom:%>X4   K       ;
    +N+Coll+Ess:%>X4in K       ;
        +N+Coll:%>X2   MALLAS- ;


LEXICON BEANA !!= * __@CODE@__ Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Anim. Gradating 0-Nouns
   SEAMU ;

LEXICON SEAMU !!= * __@CODE@__ Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns
 +N:%>X4 BOAZU-NE             ; !NE
 +N:%>X2 MALLAS-              ;
 +N:%>X2 DenominalNounsC      ;
 +N:     DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON SEAMULONG !!= * __@CODE@__ Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Inanim. Gradating 0-Nouns
                    +N+Sg+Nom:%>X4    K                    ;
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4    R                    ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4viđá K                    ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X4viđi K                    ;
                       +N+Ess:%>X4n   K                    ;
                       +N+Ess:%>X4n%> NPxC                 ;
                           +N:%>X2    MALLAS-              ;
                           +N:%>X2    DenominalNounsC      ;
                           +N:        DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON DAHPPAGA !!= * __@CODE@__  the dáhpahuvvá fix nr2. to avoid dahpahuvvat in speller
  +N:%>X4 BOAZU-NE             ; !NE
  +N:%>X2 MALLAS-              ;
  +N:%>X2 DenominalNounsC      ;
! +N:     DenominalAdjsV1Short ;

LEXICON GAHPIR !!= * __@CODE@__ Short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
                    +N+Sg+Nom:         K                   ;
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7     flagON-R            ; ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>       flagOFF-R           ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđá K                   ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7#viđi K                   ;
                       +N+Ess:%>in     K                   ;
                           +N:%>       MALLAS-             ; ! GAI, NPx, NPl
                           +N:         DenominalNounsC     ;
                           +N:         DenominalAdjsCShort ;
                  +N+Use/-PLX:%>X7     GEAHTES             ;
                +N+Err/DerSub:         KEAHTTA-PRED        ;

LEXICON ENGEL !!= * __@CODE@__ Restricted denominals for speller   -eŋgel
     +N+Sg+Nom:     K                   ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R            ; ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>   flagOFF-R           ;
        +N+Ess:%>in K                   ;
            +N:%>   MALLAS-             ; ! GAI, NPx, NPl
 +N+Use/-Spell:     DenominalNounsC     ;
 +N+Use/-Spell:     DenominalAdjsCShort ;
   +N+Use/-PLX:%>X7 GEAHTES             ;


LEXICON GAHPIRLONGSHORT !!= * __@CODE@__ Long and short compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
                    +N+Sg+Nom:      K               ;
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>    R               ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K               ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K               ;
                       +N+Ess:%>in  K               ;
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7  flagON-R        ; ! gahpergánda, čoahkkenordnet
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>    flagOFF-R       ;
                           +N:%>    MALLAS-         ; ! GAI, NPx, NPl
                           +N:      DenominalNounsC ;
                           +N:      DenominalAdjsC  ;
                  +N+Use/-PLX:%>X7  GEAHTES         ;
           +N+Use/NG+Use/-PLX:      GEAHTES         ;
                +N+Err/DerSub:      KEAHTTA-PRED    ;


LEXICON GAHPIRLONG !!= * __@CODE@__ Long compound-forms. Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Nouns
                    +N+Sg+Nom:      K                  ;
                 +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>    R                  ; ! gahpirgánda, čoahkkinordnet
 +N+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđá K                  ;
 +N+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:#viđi K                  ;
                       +N+Ess:%>in  K                  ;
                           +N:%>    MALLAS-            ; ! GAI, NPx, NPl
                           +N:      DenominalNounsC    ;
                           +N:      DenominalAdjsCLong ;
                  +N+Use/-PLX:      GEAHTES            ;
                +N+Err/DerSub:      KEAHTTA-PRED       ;
