src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
sorbmeneŋgel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:sorbmen#eŋgel ENGEL ;
bensenmuhtor:bensen#muhtor GAHPIR ;
biikaruohtas:biika#ruohttas MALIS ;
biilamálenmeaštár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:biila#málen#meaštár GAHPIRLONG ;
birračuoiggus:birra#čuoj'gus MALISLONG ;
boandanisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:boanda#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
boarisvuođadoarjja+Money:boarisvuođa#doar'jag8 SEAMU ;
heastasiema:heasta#siepman8 BEANA ;
busságeahpil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Plant:bussá#geahpil GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
buđetgeallir:buđet#geal'lir MALISLONGSHORT ;
bádjedoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bádje#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
vuoigatvuođaortnet:vuoigatvuođa#ortneg GAHPIR ;
bátnedivššár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:bátne#divššár GAHPIRLONG ;
bávkkus:báv'kus MALISLONG ;
bávččasgoddindálkkas:bávččas#goddin#dál'kas MALIS ;
dahpa:dahppag8 DAHPPAGA ;
dorresábin+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:dorre#sáh'pin MALISLONGSHORT ;
duodjedoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:duodje#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
viidnakeallir:viidna#keal'lir MALISLONGSHORT ;
viidnekeallir:viidne#keal'lir MALISLONGSHORT ;
duodjemeašttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:duodje#meaš'tir MALISLONG ;
mediabuvtta:media#buk'tag8 SEAMU ;
duollobábir:duollo#báh'pir MALIS ;
opposišuvdnapolitihkkár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:opposišuvdna#politihkkár GAHPIRLONG ;
siidaguoibmenisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:siida#guoibme#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
eledávval:ele#dávval GAHPIR ;
eŋgel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:eŋgel ENGEL ;
fiehta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:fiehttag8 BEANA ;
fievrridanfanas+Veh:fievrri7dan#fatnas MALIS ;
filbmaneavttár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:filbma#neavttár GAHPIRLONG ;
fitnodatnisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:fitnodat#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
njáhkábivddus:njáhká#biv'dus MALISLONG ;
fylkkašibitdoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:fylkka#šibit#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
ráidalasdoarjja+Money:ráidalas#doar'jag8 SEAMU ;
gaccir:gaccir GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
gallis+CmpN/None:gal'lis OVCCIS ;
neilihkaspigir:neilihka#spih'kir MALIS ;
gollenásteboagán:golle#náste#boah'kán MALISLONG ;
gudnedoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:gudne#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
guotta:guoddag8 BEANA ;
gáldocealkka:gáldo#ceal'kag8 SEAMU ;
gámmir+Use/NG:gámmir GAHPIRLONGSHORT ; 
gárdesábin+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:gárde#sáh'pin MALISLONGSHORT ;
skuvlaastuáiggeortnet:skuvla#astu#áigge#ortneg GAHPIR ;
hálddahusbiras:hálddahus#birras MALIS ;
idjagozán+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:idja#gozán GAHPIRLONG ;
kullir:kul'lir MALISLONG ;
leaskanisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:leaska#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
luohtelávlla:luohte#láv'lag8 SEAMU ;
lohkkir:lohkkir GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
liikabeana+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:liika#beatnag8 BEANA ;
lohkanbadjedivat+Money:lohkan#badje#divad GAHPIR ;
moattes+CmpN/None:moadde7s OVCCIS ;
moattis+CmpN/None:moaddis OVCCIS ;
muogir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani+Dial/%-KJ:muoh'ki7r MALIS ;
mánáiddoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:mánáid9#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
oaivilčálus+Txt:oaivil#čállus MALISLONG ;
máŋggas+CmpN/None:máŋ'gas OVCCIS ;
nationálačoahkkin+Event:nationála#čoahkkim GAHPIRLONG ;
nieiddasnisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:nieiddas#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
niitosábin+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:niito#sáh'pin MALISLONGSHORT ;
njuikkuhanvuotta:njuikkuhan#vuoddag8 SEAMU ;
oanehisnjunčuonjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:oanehis#njun#čuotnjág8 BEANA ;
maorinisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:maori#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
orut+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Ani:oruh GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
polesmeasttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:poles#meas'tir MALISLONG ;
registtarortnet:registtar#ortneg GAHPIR ;
seaidnejeagil+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Plant:seaidne#jeah'kil MALIS ;
servvodatdieđa:servvodat#dieh'tag8 SEAMU ;
sierrán:sierrám GAHPIRLONG ;
skuoggir:skuoggir GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
rádjašibitdoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:rádja#šibit#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
soahkesábin+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:soahke#sáh'pin MALISLONGSHORT ;
seniornisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:senior#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
stáhpečála+Txt:stáhpe#čállag8 BEANA ;
suohkanšibitdoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:suohkan#šibit#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
sámeváhnen+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:sáme#váhnem GAHPIR ;
muohtaeŋgel+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:muohta#eŋgel ENGEL ;
gárdevarris+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:gárde#var'ris MALISLONG ;
vildanisu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:vilda#nissun8 SEAMULONG ;
vinjučála+Txt:vinju#čállag8 BEANA ;
vuobis+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:vuobis GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
vuovdegoddesábin+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Ani:vuovde#godde#sáh'pin MALISLONGSHORT ;
vuovdemeaštár+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:vuovde#meaštár GAHPIRLONG ;
sáddenbábir:sádden#báh'pi7r MALIS ;
váhnendoarjja+Money:váhnen#doar'jag8 SEAMU ;
váibmodoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:váibmo#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
ossodatváldodoavttir+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:ossodat#váldo#doak'tir DOAVTTIR ;
čađačála+Txt:čađa#čállag8 BEANA ;
čáhput+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum+Ani:čáhpuh GAHPIRLONGSHORT ;
nárkorusttet+Use/Sub:narko#rustteg GAHPIR ;
